Utah statutes.
11-2-8.   Donations.
The governing body in any city, town, county or school district may take
charge of and use any grounds, buildings or other facilities which may be
offered, either temporarily or permanently, by any individual or corporation
for playground and recreation purposes; and may receive donations, legacies,
bequests or devises for the establishment, improvement or maintenance of
recreational facilities and activities. All moneys so received shall, unless
otherwise provided by the terms of the gift or devise, be deposited in the
treasury of the city, town, county or school district to the credit of the
recreation fund, and may be withdrawn only in the manner provided for the
payment of money appropriated for the acquisition, improvement, operation and
maintenance of playgrounds and other recreational facilities and activities.
